Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5033.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REDWOOD FALLS; MUNICIPAL AIRPORT.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $3,386,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to the city of Redwood Falls to design, construct, and equip improvements to the municipal airport. This appropriation includes money for reconstruction of the airport's aircraft parking ramp and parallel taxiway to Runways 12 and 30, Runways 12 and 30 mill and overlay, and installation of a stormwater management system for future projects outlined in the Airport Layout Plan. The grant under this subdivision is exempt from the requirements in Minnesota Statutes, sections 16B.32, 16B.325, 216C.19, and 216C.20. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $3,386,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end